Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
654

SPECIAL
PROCEEDINGS FOR IMMEDIATE

POSSESSION
OF PERSONAL PROPERTY

Section

654-1 Information required

654-2 Bond

654-3 Execution of the order

654-4 Examination of defendant

654-5 Delivery

654-6 Return of officer

654-7 Judgment

654-8 Plaintiff's option

654-8.5 College savings program; exemptions

654-9 Other remedies not affected

Note

This chapter was completely revised by L 1972, c 90, §1. The
sections of the chapter are renumbered as set forth below. The following table
shows the current disposition of the chapter.

Disposition Table

HRS (1968) Herein

654-1 to 14 R

654-21 654-1

654-22 654-2

654-23 R

654-24 654-3

654-25 654-4

654-26 654-5

654-27 654-6

654-28 654-7

654-29 654-8

654-30 654-9

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next